Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 53.1 Rhode Island School Improvement Team Act

16-53.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island School Improvement Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 262, § 1.

16-53.1-2.
Establishment of school improvement teams.

The school board or school committees of the cities and towns shall establish a school improvement team for each school in the district, and shall develop procedures for the election and appointment of school improvement team members. Each school improvement team shall be composed of the principal and an appropriately balanced number of teachers, education support employees, students, parents, and other business and community citizens who are representative of the ethnic, racial, and economic community served by the school, provided that vocational-technical center and high school school-improvement teams shall include students, and middle and junior high school school-improvement teams may include students. Members representing teachers, education support employees, students, and parents shall be selected by their peer groups at the school in a fair and equitable manner. At the middle and high school levels, where there are designated department heads, those department heads will also be included on the school improvement team. At a minimum, these school improvement teams at this middle and high school level shall include at least one department head from a humanities subject area and at least one department head from one of the science, technology, engineering, or mathematics subject areas.

Business and other community members shall be selected by the school according to a procedure established by the school board. The school board shall review the membership composition of each school improvement team. Should the school board determine that the membership elected by the school is not representative of the ethnic, racial, and economic community served by the school, the board shall appoint additional members to achieve proper representation. For the purposes of school improvement teams, the term “teacher” includes classroom teachers, certified student services personnel, and media specialists. For purposes of this subsection, “education support employee” means any person employed by a school who is not defined as instructional or administrative personnel pursuant to law and whose duties require twenty (20) or more hours in each normal working week.

The school board may establish a district school improvement team representative of the district and composed of teachers, students, parents, and other citizens or a district school improvement team which may be comprised of representatives of each school improvement team.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 50; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 4.

16-53.1-3.
Duties of the school improvement teams.

The school improvement team, including the school principal, shall meet regularly and shall assist in the identification of the educational needs of the students attending the school; make recommendations to the principal for the development, implementation, and assessment of a curriculum accommodation plan; and shall assist in the review of the annual school budget and in the formulation of a school improvement plan, as provided below.

The principal of each school, in consultation with the school improvement team established pursuant to this chapter, shall, on an annual basis, develop and submit to the district superintendent a plan for improving student performance. The superintendent shall review and approve the plan, after consultation with the school committee. Plans shall be prepared in a manner and form prescribed by the department of elementary and secondary education and shall conform to any policies and practices of the district consistent therewith. If the superintendent does not approve a plan submitted by the principal, the plan shall be returned to the principal who shall, after consultation with the school improvement team, resubmit the plan to the superintendent who shall review and approve the resubmitted plan after consultation with the school committee.

Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the school committee from granting a school improvement team additional authority in the area of educational policy; provided, however, that school improvement teams shall have no authority over the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28; and provided further, that school improvement teams have no authority to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 4.

16-53.1-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of a provision to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 262, § 1.